Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-502.5 of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the Vaccine
Mandate Prohibition Act.
B. As used in this section, "covered entity" means:
1. A state agency;
2. A political subdivision;
3. Any entity that accepts funds from the state, the federal
government, or a political subdivision from whatever source derived;

Req. No. 10746 Page 1

4. Any entity that employs individuals who are required by the
state or a political subdivision to have licensure or certification
issued by a state agency;
5. Any hospital licensed by the State Department of Health; or
6. Any private entity.
C. A covered entity or agent of a covered entity shall not
require the receipt of any vaccine used to prevent infection by any
current or future variant of SARS-CoV-2 or the development of
Coronavirus disease (COVID-19) for any reason including, but not
limited to, as a condition of employment, professional licensure,
educational admittance, certification or degree, admittance to any
place of business or entertainment, or access to any mode of
transportation.
D. A covered entity or agent of a covered entity shall not
discriminate against, punish, demote, or isolate any employee of the
covered entity based on whether the employee has received a vaccine
used to prevent infection by any current or future variant of SARS-
CoV-2 or the development of COVID-19.
E. A covered entity or agent of a covered entity shall not be
liable in a civil action claiming an injury from exposure or
potential exposure to any current or future variant of SARS-CoV-2 or
from the development of COVID-19 if the act or omission alleged to
violate a duty of care of the covered entity or agent of the covered
entity was in compliance with this section.
Req. No. 10746 Page 2

SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-10746 TJ 01/02/25


















Req. No. 10746 Page 3